Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. Wage Claims.

Administrative Code. —

For payment of wages, see 8 AAC 25.

Sec. 23.05.140.
Pay periods; penalty.

An employee and employer may agree in an annual initial contract of employment to monthly pay periods when the employer shall pay the employee for all labor performed or services rendered. Otherwise, the employer shall establish monthly or semi-monthly pay periods, at the election of the employee.

If the employment is terminated, all wages, salaries, or other compensation for labor or services become due immediately and shall be paid within the time required by this subsection at the place where the employee is usually paid or at a location agreed upon by the employer and employee. If the employment is terminated by the employer, regardless of the cause for the termination, payment is due within three working days after the termination. If the employment is terminated by the employee, payment is due at the next regular pay day that is at least three days after the employer received notice of the employee’s termination of services.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 19 SLA 1971.]

If an employer violates (b) of this section by failing to pay within the time required by that subsection, the employer may be required to pay the employee a penalty in the amount of the employee’s regular wage, salary, or other compensation from the time of demand to the time of payment, or for 90 working days, whichever is the lesser amount.

In an action brought by the department under this section, an employer found liable for failing to pay wages within the time required by (b) of this section shall be required to pay the penalty set out in (d) of this section. The amount of the penalty shall be calculated based on the employee’s straight time rate of pay for an eight-hour day.

In an action brought for unpaid overtime under AS

23.10.060

that results in an award of liquidated damages under AS

23.10.110

, the provisions of (d) of this section do not apply unless the action was brought by the department under (e) of this section.

History.

(§ 43-2-11 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1959; am §§ 1, 2 ch 19 SLA 1971; am §§ 1, 2 ch 11 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1983; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 48 SLA 2000; am § 17 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “shall pay the employee” for “shall pay all employees” following “when the employer”.

Sec. 23.05.150.
Pay orders. [Repealed, § 2 ch 19 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 23.05.160.
Notice of wage payments.

An employer shall notify an employee in writing at the time of hiring of the day and place of payment, and the rate of pay, and of any change with respect to these items on the payday before the time of change. An employer may give this notice by posting a statement of the facts, and keeping it posted conspicuously at or near the place of work where the statement can be seen by each employee as the employee comes or goes to the place of work.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(a) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.170.
Wages earned before strike, lockout, or layoff.

An employee who goes on strike, or is temporarily laid off or subjected to an employer lockout during a pay period shall receive the portion of compensation earned on or before the next regular payday established as required in this chapter.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(b) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.180.
Wages in dispute.

If the amount of wages is in dispute, the employer shall give written notice to the employee of the wages, or part of the wages, that the employer concedes to be due, and shall pay that amount, without condition, within the time set by this chapter. The employee retains all remedies that the employee might otherwise be entitled to, including those provided under this chapter or AS 23.10, to any balance claimed.

The acceptance by an employee of a payment under this section does not constitute a release of the balance of the claim, and a release required by an employer as a condition of payment is void.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(c) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1983)

Sec. 23.05.190.
Enforcement.

The department shall

enforce this chapter;

investigate possible violations of this chapter;

institute actions for penalties provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 43-2-11 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.200.
Hearings on wage claims.

The department may hold hearings to investigate a claim for wages. It may cooperate with an employee in the enforcement of a claim against the employer when it considers the claim just and valid.

The authorized representative of the department, in conducting a hearing under this chapter, may administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath, issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, records, payrolls, and evidentiary documents, and may take depositions and affidavits in a proceeding before the department at the place most convenient to both employer and employee.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena or a witness refuses to testify to a matter regarding which the witness may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of a competent court may, on application by the department, compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from the court or a refusal to testify before it.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(d)(1)-(3) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In subsection (b), in 2008, “and” was inserted before “evidentiary documents”, and, in 2016, a comma following “attendance of witnesses” was deleted, to correct a manifest error in ch 34, SLA 1949.

Administrative Code. —

For payment of wages, see 8 AAC 25.

Sec. 23.05.210.
Proceedings by attorney general.

The attorney general may prosecute a civil case arising under this chapter that is referred to the attorney general by the department for that purpose.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(d)(4) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.220.
Assignment of liens and claims to department.

The department may take an assignment of (1) a wage claim and an incidental expense account and an advance; (2) a mechanics or other lien of an employee; (3) a claim based on a “stop order” for wages or on a bond for labor; for damages for misrepresentation of a condition of employment; against an employment agency or its bondsman; for unreturned bond money of an employee; for a penalty for nonpayment of wages; for the return of a worker’s tools in the illegal possession of another person; and for vacation pay or severance pay.

The department is not bound by any rule requiring the consent of the spouse of a married claimant, the filing of a lien for record before it is assigned, or prohibiting the assignment of a claim for penalty before the claim has been incurred or by any other technical rule with reference to the validity of an assignment.

The department may not accept an assignment of a claim in excess of the amount set out in AS

22.15.040

as the maximum amount, exclusive of costs, interest, and attorney fees, for the jurisdiction of the district court to hear an action for the payment of wages as a small claim.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(e)(1) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1965; am § 3 ch 11 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 48 SLA 2000)

Sec. 23.05.230.
Prosecution of claims.

The department may prosecute an action for the collection of a claim of a person whom it considers entitled to its services, and whom it considers to have a claim that is valid and enforceable.

The department may prosecute an action for the return of a worker’s tools that are in the illegal possession of another person.

The department may join several claimants in one lien to the extent allowed by the lien laws and, in case of suit, join them in one cause of action. A bond is not required from the department in connection with an action brought as assignee under this section and AS

23.05.220

.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(e)(1), (2) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.05.240.
Officers to execute process without security; immunity from damages; custody of property.

An officer, requested by the department to serve a summons, writ, complaint, order, garnishment paper, or other process within the officer’s jurisdiction, shall do it without requiring the department to furnish security or bond.

When the department requests an officer to seize or levy on property in an attachment proceeding to satisfy a wage claim judgment, the officer shall do so without requiring the department to furnish security or bond.

The officer, in carrying out the provisions of this section, is not responsible in damages for a wrongful seizure made in good faith.

If anyone other than the defendant claims the right of possession or ownership to the seized property, the officer may permit the third party claimant to have the custody of property, pending determination of the court as to who has the better right to possession or ownership.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(e)(3), (4) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.05.250.
Witness fees of garnishee defendants.

A garnishee defendant, when required to appear in court in an action brought under AS

23.05.230

, shall do so without having witness fees paid in advance.
But the witness fees are included as part of the taxable costs of the action and are paid to the garnishee defendant after judgment.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(e)(5) ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.05.260.
Disposition of funds recovered.

Out of a recovery in an action under AS

23.05.220

there shall be paid first, court costs advanced by the department which shall be returned to the department’s appropriation for this purpose and second, the wage claim involved.

When an action is lost by the department, it shall pay costs out of money appropriated for that purpose.

History.

(§ 43-2-11(e)(5), (6) ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1959)